North Carolina, session 2025, HB361.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of the Secretary of State the sum of one million eight hundred
thousand dollars ($1,800,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used in
collaboration with the North Carolina Association of Registers of Deeds to provide antifraud
training for employees of county register of deeds offices. The Department of the Secretary of
State, in conjunction with the North Carolina Association of Registers of Deeds, may use an
amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the funds appropriated in this section for
administrative costs.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Justice the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to create and launch a statewide
public awareness campaign on fraud relating to real property.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Information Technology the sum of thirty million dollars
($30,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to provide
need-based grants to the county register of deeds offices, said grants to be used in accordance
with this section. The Department of Information Technology may award grants to the county
register of deeds offices for a total amount not exceeding forty percent (40%) of the funds
appropriated in this section to be used by the county register of deeds offices to purchase scanning
equipment and provide for the digitization and storing of records kept by that office, including,
but not limited to, identification cards, passports, and other forms of identification. The
Department of Information Technology may award grants to the county register of deeds offices
for a total amount not exceeding fifteen percent (15%) of the funds appropriated in this section
to be used by the county register of deeds offices for the purchase of software upgrades. The
Department of Information Technology may award grants to the county register of deeds offices
for a total amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the funds appropriated in this section to be
used by the county register of deeds offices to procure cloud storage and backup. The Department
of Information Technology may award grants to the county register of deeds offices for a total
amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the funds appropriated in this section to be used by
the county register of deeds offices for the purpose of enhancing the digital security of those
offices. The Department of Information Technology may award grants to the county register of
*H361-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
deeds offices for a total amount not exceeding eight percent (8%) of the funds appropriated in
this section to be used by the county register of deeds offices for the purpose of training staff.
The Department of Information Technology may award grants to the county register of deeds
offices for a total amount not exceeding fifteen percent (15%) of the funds appropriated in this
section to be used by the county register of deeds offices for network and hardware
improvements, including network improvements that would allow for better communication or
integration with the networks and systems maintained by the Secretary of State's Office and
municipal tax offices. The Department of Information Technology may use an amount not
exceeding two percent (2%) of the funds appropriated in this section for administrative costs.
The Department of Information Technology shall develop criteria and an application process for
the grants funded by this section.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Information Technology the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to provide
need-based grants to county register of deeds offices that do not have a fraud detection alert
system in place as of the effective date of this section. The Department of Information
Technology shall develop a process by which county register of deeds offices may apply for the
grants funded by this section.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 361-First Edition